dev/infreq-apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
    <pardef n="f/ot__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øtene</l>
          <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oten</l>
          <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øter</l>
          <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ot</l>
          <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ættled__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="h/and__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anda</l>
          <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>andi</l>
          <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>and</l>
          <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endene</l>
          <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ender</l>
          <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="joul/e__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ane</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pagina__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="H__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>H</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/vera__vbser">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>vera</l>
          <r>vera<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>vera<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>var</l>
          <r>vera<s n="vbser"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vera</l>
          <r>vera<s n="vbser"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vil/le__vblex_adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="r/ivas__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eivs</l>
          <r>ivas<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ivas</l>
          <r>ivas<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ives</l>
          <r>ivas<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ivis</l>
          <r>ivas<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ivs</l>
          <r>ivas<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/ynge__vblex_adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ong</l>
          <r>ynge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unge</l>
          <r>ynge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ungi</l>
          <r>ynge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yngast</l>
          <r>ynge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ynga</l>
          <r>ynge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ynge</l>
          <r>ynge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yng</l>
          <r>ynge<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yng</l>
          <r>ynge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="øv/e__vblex_adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ast</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="svartand"><i>svart</i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
    <e lm="verkehand"><i>verkeh</i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stokkand"><i>stokk</i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
    <e lm="syrgjerand"><i>syrgjer</i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vinstrehand"><i>vinstreh</i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tomannshand"><i>tomannsh</i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
    <e lm="symjefot"><i>symjef</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sørgjerand"><i>sørgjer</i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trifot"><i>trif</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stolfot"><i>stolf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vandringsfot"><i>vandringsf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gullrand"><i>gullr</i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
    <e lm="børstefot"><i>børstef</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="himmelrand"><i>himmelr</i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dyrefot"><i>dyref</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bakhand"><i>bakh</i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dagsrand"><i>dagsr</i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blodrand"><i>blodr</i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fiendehand"><i>fiendeh</i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
    <e lm="friarfot"><i>friarf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flathand"><i>flath</i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hjelpehand"><i>hjelpeh</i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flyttfot"><i>flyttf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="daudinghand"><i>daudingh</i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flatfot"><i>flatf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fiskand"><i>fisk</i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bordfot"><i>bordf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ættled"><i>ættled</i><par n="ættled__n"/></e>
    <e lm="firefot"><i>firef</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="isand"><i>is</i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
    <e lm="firfot"><i>firf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grytefot"><i>grytef</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="overhand"><i>overh</i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skottfot"><i>skottf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sengefot"><i>sengef</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skotfot"><i>skotf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ranghand"><i>rangh</i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
    <e lm="premifot"><i>premif</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sitjefot"><i>sitjef</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ringfot"><i>ringf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="satsfot"><i>satsf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sengfot"><i>sengf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="krikkand"><i>krikk</i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
    <e lm="krokfot"><i>krokf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="laksand"><i>laks</i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
    <e lm="meisterhand"><i>meisterh</i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klivefot"><i>klivef</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="joletrefot"><i>joletref</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="iklede"><i>ikled</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="avleive"><i>avleiv</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hæde"><i>hæd</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="leige"><i>leig</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fløde"><i>flød</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hyde"><i>hyd</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="blyge"><i>blyg</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="skreide"><i>skreid</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tilarbeide"><i>tilarbeid</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hyve"><i>hyv</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="godrøde"><i>godrød</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gøyve"><i>gøyv</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kaldsmide"><i>kaldsmid</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="forbløde"><i>forblød</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="avråde"><i>avråd</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="smide"><i>smid</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="styve"><i>styv</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="døyde"><i>døyd</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lode"><i>lod</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="træde"><i>træd</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tjærebrede"><i>tjærebred</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="yve"><i>yv</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gjennomgløde"><i>gjennomglød</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
